Illinois, session 104th, SB1206.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Firearms Restraining Order Act is amended 5by changing Section 5 as follows: 6    (430 ILCS 67/5)7    Sec. 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:8    "Family member of the respondent" means a spouse, former 9spouse, person with whom the respondent has a minor child in 10common, parent, child, or step-child of the respondent, any 11other person related by blood or present marriage to the 12respondent, or a person who shares a common dwelling with the 13respondent.14    "Firearms restraining order" means an order issued by the 15court, prohibiting and enjoining a named person from having in 16his or her custody or control, purchasing, possessing, or 17receiving any firearms or ammunition, or removing firearm 18parts that could be assembled to make an operable firearm. 19    "Intimate partner" means a spouse, former spouse, a person 20with whom the respondent has or allegedly has a child in 21common, or a person with whom the respondent has or has had a 22dating or engagement relationship.23    "Petitioner" means:  SB1206- 2 -LRB104 02940 RLC 12956 b1        (1) a family member of the respondent as defined in 2    this Act; or 3        (2) a law enforcement officer who files a petition 4    alleging that the respondent poses a danger of causing 5    personal injury to himself, herself, or another by having 6    in his or her custody or control, purchasing, possessing, 7    or receiving a firearm, ammunition, or firearm parts that 8    could be assembled to make an operable firearm or removing 9    firearm parts that could be assembled to make an operable 10    firearm.11    If the petitioner is a law enforcement officer, the 12petitioner shall be referred to as the law enforcement agency 13in which the officer is employed on all public indexes 14concerning the petition and not the individually named officer 15who filed the petition. 16    "Respondent" means the person alleged in the petition to 17pose a danger of causing personal injury to himself, herself, 18or another by having in his or her custody or control, 19purchasing, possessing, or receiving a firearm, ammunition, or 20firearm parts that could be assembled to make an operable 21firearm or removing firearm parts that could be assembled to 22make an operable firearm.23(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 102-345, eff. 6-1-22.) 24    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 25becoming law.